Maryland, session 2025, SB0099.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – General
10–207.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0099*

SENATE BILL 99
(a) To the extent included in federal adjusted gross income, the amounts under
this section are subtracted from the federal adjusted gross income of a resident to determine
Maryland adjusted gross income.
(q) (1) (i) In this subsection the following words have the meanings
indicated.
(ii) “Military retirement income” means retirement income,
including death benefits, received as a result of military service.
(iii) “Military service” means:
1. induction into the armed forces of the United States for
training and service under the Selective Training and Service Act of 1940 or a subsequent
act of a similar nature;
2. membership in a reserve component of the armed forces of
the United States;
3. membership in an active component of the armed forces of
the United States;
4. membership in the Maryland National Guard; or
5. active duty with the commissioned corps of the Public
Health Service, the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration, or the Coast and
Geodetic Survey.
(2) The subtraction under subsection (a) of this section includes:
[(i) if, on the last day of the taxable year, the individual is under the
age of 55 years, the first $12,500 of military retirement income received by an individual
during the taxable year; and
(ii) if, on the last day of the taxable year, the individual is at least 55
years old, the first $20,000 of military retirement income received by an individual during
the taxable year]
(I) FOR A TAXABLE YEAR BEGINNING AFTER DECEMBER 31,
2024, BUT BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2026, THE FIRST $25,000 OF MILITARY RETIREMENT
INCOME RECEIVED BY AN INDIVIDUAL DURING THE TAXABLE YEAR; AND
(II) FOR A TAXABLE YEAR BEGINNING AFTER DECEMBER 31,
2025, THE FIRST $40,000 OF MILITARY RETIREMENT INCOME RECEIVED BY AN
INDIVIDUAL DURING THE TAXABLE YEAR.

SENATE BILL 99 3
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.